Alabama, session 2026rs, HB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
84 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
Page 3

Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
85 the Alabama Women's Childbirth Alternatives, Resources, and
86 Education (CARE) Act.
87 Section 2. For the purposes of Sections 2 through 6 of
88 this act, the following terms have the following meanings:
89 (1) BOARD. The Board of Pardons and Paroles.
90 (2) DIRECTOR. The Director of the Board of Pardons and
91 Paroles.
92 (3) POSTPARTUM. The 12-month period following
93 childbirth unless extended by a health care professional due
94 to complications.
95 Section 3. (a)(1) Upon the admission of each woman to a
96 jail, the individual conducting the initial intake medical
97 screening shall ask the woman whether she is pregnant,
98 suspects that she may be pregnant, or is postpartum. If the
99 woman is pregnant or suspects she may be pregnant, the woman
100 shall be given a urine pregnancy test within three days of her
101 initial intake medical screening, unless the woman declines
102 testing. The results of the pregnancy test shall be used
103 solely for the purpose of determining pregnancy for medical
104 and diversion purposes pursuant to Sections 2 through 6 of
105 this act.
106 (2) Pregnancy testing shall be offered voluntarily,
107 with informed consent, and conducted privately. No woman may
108 be penalized for declining pregnancy testing.
109 (b)(1) If a woman given a pregnancy test pursuant to
110 subsection (a) tests positive for pregnancy, the result shall
111 be reported to the CARE Coordinator, the court, and the county
112 health department. After receiving the report of the positive
Page 4

health department. After receiving the report of the positive
113 pregnancy test, the court shall release the woman on her own
114 recognizance, with non-monetary conditions, and under
115 supervision, provided that the court determines that the
116 pregnant woman does not pose a documented, immediate risk to
117 public safety.
118 (2) If a woman reports that she is postpartum, the
119 information shall be reported to the CARE Coordinator, the
120 court, and the county health department. After confirming that
121 the woman is postpartum, the court shall release the woman on
122 her own recognizance, with non-monetary conditions, and under
123 supervision, provided that the court determines that the
124 postpartum woman does not pose a documented, immediate risk to
125 public safety.
126 Section 4. (a)(1) When a pregnant or postpartum woman
127 is either: (i) sentenced to a term of imprisonment; or (ii) in
128 the custody of a county jail pending sentencing, the court may
129 include a term of probation that shall be served
130 pre-incarceration or pre-trial, provided that the court
131 determines that the pregnant or postpartum woman does not pose
132 a documented, immediate risk to public safety.
133 (2) The court may allow a pregnant or postpartum woman
134 to be supervised on a pre-incarceration term of probation for
135 the length of her pregnancy and for 12 months after the birth
136 of her child. The woman shall report to the court for further
137 guidance on the remainder of her sentence not later than 12
138 months after the birth of her child.
139 (3) The court shall order a woman released pursuant to
140 Sections 2 through 6 of this act to surrender herself to the
Page 5

Sections 2 through 6 of this act to surrender herself to the
141 Department of Corrections, the county jail, or the municipal
142 jail, as applicable, 12 months after the birth of her child.
143 (b) The failure of a woman serving a pre-incarceration
144 term of probation to surrender herself to the Department of
145 Corrections, the county jail, or the municipal jail, as
146 ordered by the court, after the birth of her child is a Class
147 D felony.
148 (c)(1) The court shall not assess any fines, fees,
149 restitution, or probation fees during a pre-incarceration term
150 of probation served under Sections 2 through 6 of this act.
151 (2) Supervision for a pre-incarceration term of
152 probation shall be conducted as follows:
153 a. By electronic monitoring administered by the board,
154 the nature and extent of which shall be determined by the
155 board on a case-by-case basis.
156 b. Through in-patient programming provided by the
157 board's reentry facility, at the discretion of the director
158 following the board's intake assessment.
159 (3) The court's jurisdiction during a pre-incarceration
160 term of probation shall be the same as set forth in Chapter 22
161 of Title 15 of the Code of Alabama 1975.
162 (d) Time served in a pre-incarceration term of
163 probation pursuant to this section shall be credited to the
164 woman's sentence or disposition.
165 (e) A pregnant or postpartum woman serving a
166 pre-incarceration term of probation shall maintain perinatal
167 health care, treatment, and assessments and participate in
168 education and resource programs to the extent that they are
Page 6

education and resource programs to the extent that they are
169 available in her community.
170 (f)(1) A pregnant woman serving a pre-incarceration
171 term of probation shall report any pregnancy loss to her
172 probation officer within 72 hours of the loss. The court shall
173 have discretion to determine when a woman who loses a
174 pregnancy during a pre-incarceration term of probation shall
175 be required to surrender herself to the Department of
176 Corrections, the county jail, or the municipal jail.
177 (2) Pregnancy loss shall be treated as a medical and
178 mental health event.
179 Section 5. (a) The board shall designate a CARE
180 Coordinator, who shall be an employee of the board, to oversee
181 case review, release planning, and care coordination for women
182 assigned a pre-incarceration term of probation pursuant to
183 Sections 2 through 6 of this act. The duties of the CARE
184 Coordinator shall include, but not be limited to, the
185 following:
186 (1) Coordinating supervised probation for pregnant
187 women and postpartum women with county jails and local courts.
188 (2) Providing support to women assigned to periods of
189 pre-incarceration terms of probation pursuant to Sections 2
190 through 6 of this act.
191 (3) As necessary, referring women assigned to
192 pre-incarceration terms of probation to behavioral health
193 services, housing, and parental support resources.
194 (b) The board shall connect each pregnant woman or
195 postpartum woman assigned a pre-incarceration term of
196 probation pursuant to Sections 2 through 6 of this act to the
Page 7

probation pursuant to Sections 2 through 6 of this act to the
197 CARE Coordinator.
198 Section 6. (a) The board may adopt rules to implement
199 and administer pre-incarceration terms of probation pursuant
200 to Sections 2 through 6 of this act.
201 (b) The board shall maintain data on the number of
202 women who are eligible for pre-incarceration terms of
203 probation, the number of women who are enrolled in
204 pre-incarceration terms of probation, the demographic data for
205 those women, and the outcome of enrollment. No later than
206 March 1 of each year, the board shall publish a report about
207 the pre-incarceration terms of probation, including, but not
208 limited to, the data required by this subsection. The board
209 shall make the report publicly available on its website.
210 Section 7. Section 14-6-19.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
211 amended to read as follows:
212 "§14-6-19.1
213 (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms
214 have the following meanings:
215 (1) CUSTODIAN. A warden, sheriff, jailer, deputy
216 sheriff, police officer, or any other law enforcement officer.
217 (2) HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL. A physician as defined in
218 Section 34-24-50.1, a licensed practical nurse or a licensed
219 professional nurse as defined in Section 34-21-1, an advanced
220 practice nurse as defined in Section 34-21-81, or an assistant
221 to physicians physician as defined in Section 34-24-290.
222 (3) IMMEDIATE POSTPARTUM PERIOD. The six-week 12-week
223 period following childbirth unless extended by a health care
224 professional due to complications.
Page 8

professional due to complications.
225 (4) OFFICER IN CHARGE. The individual who is
226 responsible for the supervision of a penal institution.
227 (5) PENAL INSTITUTION. Any place of confinement for
228 juvenile or adult individuals accused of, convicted of, or
229 adjudicated for violating a law of this state or an ordinance
230 of a political subdivision of this state.
231 (6) PREGNANT WOMAN. A juvenile or adult female who is
232 in the first, second, or third trimester of pregnancy whose
233 pregnancy has been verified by a pregnancy test as required by
234 this section.
235 (b) During the initial intake medical screening, a
236 female inmate shall inform the person conducting the screening
237 if she is pregnant or suspects that she may be pregnant.
238 (c) If the female inmate informs the person conducting
239 the screening that she suspects she may be pregnant, the
240 female inmate shall be assessed for pregnancy by a urine
241 pregnancy test within 72 hours of the initial medical intake
242 screening, unless the female inmate refuses testing.
243 (d) A pregnant woman shall not be required to squat and
244 cough during a strip search performed by a custodian, unless
245 the custodian has reason to suspect that the pregnant woman is
246 hiding contraband. In the alternative, a pregnant woman may be
247 required to squat and cough during a strip search if the strip
248 search is performed by a health care professional.
249 (e) A pregnant woman shall not be required to undergo
250 any vaginal examination unless performed by a health care
251 professional.
252 (f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
Page 9

(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
253 custodian shall not shackle or use any leg or waist restraint
254 in any of the following situations:
255 (1) On any pregnant woman.
256 (2) During labor or delivery.
257 (3) During the immediate postpartum period.
258 (g) A woman who is pregnant or in the immediate
259 postpartum period may only be restrained using leg or wrist
260 handcuffs with her wrists held in front of her body, and only
261 if the custodian makes a determination that one of the
262 following is true:
263 (1) The woman poses an immediate flight risk and cannot
264 be reasonably contained by other means.
265 (2) The woman poses an immediate risk of harm to the
266 unborn child, herself, staff, or others and cannot be
267 reasonably contained by other means.
268 (h) If a custodian uses shackles or leg or wrist
269 handcuffsrestraints on a woman who is in the immediate
270 postpartum period under an exception provided in subsection
271 (g), the custodian shall document the circumstances for and
272 details of the exception shall be documented within not later
273 than two days of after the incident. The information shall
274 include the nature of the circumstances and the length of time
275 of the use of the shackles or restraints were used. The
276 officer in charge shall review the documentation shall be
277 reviewed by the officer in charge and the penal institution
278 shall retain the documentation retained by the penal
279 institution for reporting purposes.
280 (i) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of
Page 10

(i) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of
281 medical restraints by a licensed health care professional to
282 ensure the medical safety of a pregnant woman.
283 (j) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
284 placement of a woman in a cell or hospital room by herself to
285 ensure the medical safety of the unborn child, a pregnant
286 woman, or a woman in the immediate postpartum period.
287 (k) If a custodian places a woman in a cell or hospital
288 room by herself under the exception provided in subsection
289 (j), the custodian shall document the circumstances for and
290 details of the exception shall be documented within not later
291 than two days of after the incident. The information shall
292 include the nature of the circumstances and the length of time
293 of the solitary confinement. The officer in charge shall
294 review the documentation and shall be reviewed by the officer
295 in charge and retained by the penal system shall retain the
296 documentation for reporting purposes.
297 (l) A pregnant woman who is temporarily held in a
298 county jail pending transfer to a state penal institution
299 shall be transferred as expeditiously as possible.
300 (m) The Department of Corrections and a sheriff
301 overseeing a county jail in which a pregnant woman is
302 incarcerated shall make all reasonable efforts to facilitate
303 her transfer. This subsection does not apply to a pregnant
304 woman who has been sentenced to a county jail."
305 Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
306 1, 2026.
Page 11